Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Chapter 7 Public Improvements

Cross references. —

As to powers of cities and towns generally, see §

15-1-103

.

As to requirements for municipal contract for public improvements generally, see §

15-1-113

.

As to liability of cities operating under the city manager form of government for excavations, obstructions, etc., in streets, see §

15-4-307

.

As to liability for obstructions in streets caused by railroad companies, see §

15-4-309

.

As to power of cities operating under a city manager form of government to install public utilities, see §

15-4-312

.

As to disposal of public utilities by cities operating under a city manager form of government, see §

15-4-313

.

As to local improvements generally, see §

15-6-101

et seq.

For constitutional provision that neither the state, nor any county, township, school district or municipality shall loan or give its credit to make donations to or in aid of any railroad or telegraph line, see art. 10, § 15, Wyo. Const.

For provision that no street passenger railway, telegraph, telephone or electrical light line shall be constructed within the limits of any municipal organization without the consent of its local authorities, see art. 13, § 4, Wyo. Const.

For provision prohibiting loans, credit or donations by the state or any political subdivision thereof, and requiring two-thirds vote of people for works of internal improvement, see art. 16, § 6, Wyo. Const.

As to construction and improvement of works for conservation and utilization of water, see art. 16, § 10, Wyo. Const.

For provision that eight hours actual work shall constitute a day's lawful work in all municipal works, see art. 19, § 2, Wyo. Const.

As to persons ineligible for employment on public works in cities and towns, see art. 19, § 3, Wyo. Const.

As to eminent domain generally, see §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

and Rule 71.1, W.R.C.P.

As to public works and contractor's bond, see §§

16-6-101

through

16-6-121

.

For provision that all maps, plats, plans or designs necessary to be filed in all city or town offices shall be made and certified to by a professional engineer or land surveyor, see § 33-29-139.

As to public utilities generally, see title 37.

As to joint operation of drainage districts with municipalities, see §§

41-9-401

through

41-9-403

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “No Home On the Range For Home Rule,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 791 (1996).